Ohio, session 136, HB846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2919.252 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2919.252. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Personal identifier" means an address, social security number, driver's license number, or any state identification number. (2) "Repeat domestic violence offender" means a person about whom both of the following apply: (a) The person currently is being convicted of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code. (b) The person previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to one or more violations of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code. (B) The repeat domestic violence offender registry is created. The bureau of criminal identification and investigation shall maintain the registry. (C)(1) If a person is convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code, the court shall determine whether the person is a repeat domestic violence offender. (2) If the court determines that the person is a repeat domestic violence offender, the court shall order the repeat domestic violence offender to register with the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. The clerk of the court shall provide the bureau with a certified copy of the record of conviction of or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to section 2919.25 of the Revised Code not later than seven days after the date of conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere. (D) If a court orders a repeat domestic violence offender to register with the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, the repeat domestic violence offender shall register with the bureau not later than seven days after the date of conviction of or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code by providing the bureau with the following information: (1) A certified copy of any records of a conviction of or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code; (2) The repeat domestic violence offender's name; (3) The repeat domestic violence offender's date of birth; (4) The date of conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code; (5) The name of the court in which the repeat domestic violence offender was convicted or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code; (6) A current photograph of the repeat domestic violence offender; (7) A copy of the repeat domestic violence offender's driver's license or state identification card. (E)(1) The bureau shall enter the repeat domestic violence offender and the information described in division (D) of this section into the repeat domestic violence offender registry. (2)(a) Except as provided in division (E)(2)(b) of this section, the bureau shall make the information described in divisions (D)(1) to (6) of this section available to the public on its internet web site. (b) The bureau shall not make available to the public on its internet web site any personal identifiers of the repeat domestic violence offender. (F) The bureau shall remove the repeat domestic violence offender and the information described in division (D) of this section from the repeat domestic violence offender registry at the following intervals: (1) If the repeat domestic violence offender has one prior conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code, two years after the date of the most recent conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code; (2) If the repeat domestic violence offender has two prior convictions or pleas of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code, five years after the date of the most recent conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code; (3) If the repeat domestic violence offender has three or more prior convictions or pleas of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code, ten years after the date of the most recent conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a violation of section 2919.25 of the Revised Code.